Nevada, session 83, AB315.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 422.550 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.550 1. Each application or report submitted to participate
as a provider, each report stating income or expense upon which
rates of payment are or may be based, and each invoice for payment
for goods or services provided to a recipient must contain a
statement that all matters stated therein are true and accurate, signed
by a natural person who is the provider or is authorized to act for the
provider, under the pains and penalties of perjury.
2. In addition to the requirements of subsection 1, each
application submitted to participate as a provider must be
accompanied by verification of the identity and signature of the
natural person who signed the statement pursuant to subsection 1:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(a) By oath or affirmation of the person administered by a
notary public or other person authorized by law to administer
oaths or affirmations; or
(b) Through an electronic identity verification system that is
used or approved by the Department for the purpose of verifying
the identification or signature of a person.
3. A person is guilty of perjury which is a category D felony
and shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130 if the person
signs or submits, or causes to be signed or submitted, [such] a
statement [,] described in subsection 1, knowing that the
application, report or invoice contains information which is false, in
whole or in part, by commission or by omission.
[3.] 4. For the purposes of this section, a person who signs on
behalf of a provider is presumed to have the authorization of the
provider and to be acting at the direction of the provider.
5. As used in this section, “electronic identity verification
system” means an electronic system that is capable of verifying the
identity or signature of a person by:
(a) Using multifactor authentication;
(b) Verifying data contained within governmental databases or
appearing on government-issued identification cards, including,
without limitation, photographs and signatures;
(c) Utilizing biometric data or facial recognition technology;
(d) Utilizing a combination of any mechanism described in
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c); or
(e) Utilizing other secure and accurate means or procedures.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)